Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska58-262
Bonds; signatures of prior members or officers; validity.

In the event that any of the members or officers of the authority cease to be members or officers of the authority prior to the delivery of any bonds or coupons signed by them, their signatures or facsimiles thereof shall nevertheless be valid and sufficient for all purposes as if such members or officers had remained in office until such delivery.

Laws 1983, LB 626, § 62;

Laws 1991, LB 253, § 61.